Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
FROZEN FOOD PRODUCTS

§328-61 Notifying consumer. No person
shall sell or offer to sell any uncooked thawed food which substantially
resembles the physical appearances of the fresh food without a label, as
hereinafter described, notifying the purchaser that such food had been frozen
and then thawed out; provided that this section shall not apply if the thawed
foods are processed by grinding or have been dehydrated before being offered
for retail sale. [L 1967, c 206, pt of §1; HRS §328-61; am L 1980, c 40, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next